Hawaii statutes.
[§27-53] Annual report. The board
shall prepare an annual report on progress towards key community outcomes
adopted by the legislature, which shall be transmitted to the governor, the
legislature, and the public. [L 1999, c 160, §15]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next